Utah statutes.
17C-4-103.   Community development project area plan requirements.

Each community development project area plan and draft project area plan shall:

(1)  describe the boundaries of the project area, subject to Section 17C-1-414, if applicable;

(2)  contain a general statement of the land uses, layout of principal streets, population densities, and building intensities of the project area and how they will be affected by the community development;

(3)  state the standards that will guide the community development;

(4)  show how the purposes of this title will be attained by the community development;

(5)  be consistent with the general plan of the community in which the project area is located and show that the community development will conform to the community's general plan;

(6)  describe any specific project or projects that are the object of the proposed community development;

(7)  identify how private developers, if any, will be selected to undertake the community development and identify each private developer currently involved in the community development process;

(8)  state the reasons for the selection of the project area;

(9)  describe the physical, social, and economic conditions existing in the project area;

(10)  describe any tax incentives offered private entities for facilities located in the project area;

(11)  include an analysis or description of the anticipated public benefit to be derived from the community development, including:

(a)  the beneficial influences upon the tax base of the community; and

(b)  the associated business and economic activity likely to be stimulated; and

(12)  include other information that the agency determines to be necessary or advisable.

